Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1520.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. State agencies; data sharing; federal government; undocumented immigrants; visa overstays Notwithstanding any other law, this state and any agency of this state shall share any data requested by the United States government regarding the status of or any information relating to an unauthorized alien, an undocumented immigrant or any individual who overstays the individual's visa in this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Delayed repeal Section 41-710.04, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, is repealed from and after December 31, 2028.